Washington statutes.
RCW 19.126.070

Suspension or cancellation of license or certificate.

Continued violation of this chapter constitutes grounds, in the discretion of the *state liquor control board, for suspension or cancellation under RCW 66.24.010 of any license or certificate held by a supplier or its agent.

[ 1985 c 440 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "state liquor control board" was renamed the "state liquor and cannabis board" by 2015 c 70 s 3.